Maryland, session 2026, SB0588.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Natural Resources
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0588*

SENATE BILL 588
4–607.
(a) (1) The Department may issue annually a complimentary angler’s license
to the President of the United States, the governor of any state, and any official OR
ENFORCEMENT OFFICER of the game and fish department of any other state THAT
RECIPROCALLY OFFERS A COMPLIMENTARY ANGLER’S LICENSE.
(b) Not more than 20 complimentary angler’s licenses ISSUED UNDER
SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION for each state other than Maryland shall be
outstanding at any time.
4–745.
(e) (1) In this subsection, “former prisoner of war” means a person who, while
an active service member, was forcibly detained or interned in the line of duty by an enemy
government or its agents, or a hostile force, during a period of armed conflict.
(2) The Department may issue a lifetime complimentary Chesapeake Bay
and coastal sport fishing license to any Maryland resident who certifies that the resident
is:
(i) A former prisoner of war;
(ii) An American veteran who the U.S. Department of Veterans
Affairs determines is unemployable; or
(iii) A 100% service connected disabled American veteran.
(3) The Department may issue a lifetime complimentary Chesapeake Bay
and coastal sport fishing license to an out–of–state person:
(i) Who certifies that the person is:
1. A former prisoner of war;
2. An American veteran who the U.S. Department of
Veterans Affairs determines is unemployable; or
3. A 100% service connected disabled American veteran; and
(ii) Whose state of residence extends similar privileges to former
prisoners of war, American veterans who the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs
determines are unemployable, or 100% service connected disabled American veterans of
this State.

SENATE BILL 588 3
(4) A complimentary Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport fishing license is
not transferable AND SHALL BE ISSUED WITHOUT A FEE.
(5) The Department may issue annually a complimentary Chesapeake Bay
and coastal sport fishing license to the President of the United States, the governor of any
state, and any official OR ENFORCEMENT OFFICER of the game and fish department of
any other state THAT RECIPROCALLY OFFERS A COMPLIMENTARY SPORT FISHING
LICENSE.
(6) Not more than 20 complimentary Chesapeake Bay and coastal sport
fishing licenses ISSUED UNDER PARAGRAPH (5) OF THIS SUBSECTION for each state
other than Maryland shall be outstanding at any time.
4–1004.1.
(a) In this section, “former prisoner of war” means [an individual] A PERSON
who, while [serving in the active military, naval, or air service of the United States] AN
ACTIVE SERVICE MEMBER, was forcibly detained or interned in the line of duty by an
enemy government or its agents, or a hostile force, during a period of armed conflict.
(e) (2) (I) [The] SUBJECT TO SUBPARAGRAPHS (II) AND (III)
SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS PARAGRAPH, THE Department [shall] MAY issue a
LIFETIME complimentary recreational oyster license to [a]:
1. A resident of the State who certifies that the resident is:
[(i)] A. 1. A former prisoner of war;
[(ii)] B. 2. An American veteran who [is determined to be
unemployable by] the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs DETERMINES IS
UNEMPLOYABLE; OR
[(iii)] C. 3. A 100% service–connected disabled American veteran;. [or
(iv) Blind] AND
2. ANY RESIDENT OF ANY OTHER STATE WHO CERTIFIES
THAT THE PERSON IS:
A. A FORMER PRISONER OF WAR;
B. AN AMERICAN VETERAN WHO THE U.S. DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS DETERMINES IS UNEMPLOYABLE; OR

SENATE BILL 588
C. A 100% SERVICE–CONNECTED DISABLED AMERICAN
VETERAN.
(II) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE A LIFETIME
COMPLIMENTARY RECREATIONAL OYSTER LICENSE UNDER SUBPARAGRAPH (I)2 OF
THIS PARAGRAPH IF THE OTHER STATE EXTENDS RECIPROCAL PRIVILEGES TO
FORMER PRISONERS OF WAR, AMERICAN VETERANS WHO THE U.S. DEPARTMENT
OF VETERANS AFFAIRS DETERMINES ARE UNEMPLOYABLE, OR 100%
SERVICE–CONNECTED DISABLED AMERICAN VETERANS.
(III) (II) A LIFETIME COMPLIMENTARY RECREATIONAL
OYSTER LICENSE IS NOT TRANSFERRABLE AND SHALL BE ISSUED WITHOUT A FEE.
(IV) NOT MORE THAN 20 LIFETIME COMPLIMENTARY
RECREATIONAL OYSTER LICENSES FOR EACH STATE OTHER THAN MARYLAND
SHALL BE OUTSTANDING AT ANY TIME.
(4) THE DEPARTMENT MAY ISSUE AN ANNUAL COMPLIMENTARY
RECREATIONAL OYSTER LICENSE WITHOUT A FEE TO A PERSON THAT IS BLIND,
REGARDLESS OF WHETHER THE PERSON IS OR IS NOT A:
(I) BLIND; AND
(II) A RESIDENT OF THE STATE.
10–301.
(l) When the Department has adequate computer capability, the Department
shall compile statistics after the close of the hunting season each year concerning [the]:
(1) THE sale of hunting licenses for the previous season, including the
names, addresses, counties of residence, and ages of the persons who purchased the hunting
licenses and the types of hunting licenses sold;
(2) THE NUMBER OF ANNUAL COMPLIMENTARY HUNTING LICENSES
ISSUED FOR THE PREVIOUS SEASON, INCLUDING THE NAMES, OCCUPATIONS, AND
STATES OF RESIDENCE OF THE PERSONS WHO WERE ISSUED THE ANNUAL
COMPLIMENTARY HUNTING LICENSES;
(3) THE NUMBER OF LIFETIME COMPLIMENTARY HUNTING LICENSES
ISSUED FOR THE PREVIOUS SEASON AND IN TOTAL, INCLUDING THE NAMES,
ELIGIBILITY CATEGORIES, AND STATES OF RESIDENCE OF THE PERSONS WHO WERE
ISSUED THE LIFETIME COMPLIMENTARY HUNTING LICENSES; AND

SENATE BILL 588 5
(4) THE TOTAL NUMBER OF HUNTING LICENSES THAT ARE NO
LONGER ISSUED BY THE DEPARTMENT THAT REMAIN VALID.
10–301.3.
(a) There is a commemorative lifetime hunting license.
(b) The Department shall issue a limited number of commemorative lifetime
hunting licenses to certain nonprofit organizations, consistent with eligibility criteria
developed by the Department, until December 31, 2011.
(c) [Nonprofit organizations issued hunting licenses under this section may, in
cooperation with the Department, market and sell the hunting licenses] EXCEPT FOR THE
INITIAL SALE BY A NONPROFIT ORGANIZATION, A COMMEMORATIVE LIFETIME
HUNTING LICENSE IS NOT TRANSFERRABLE.
(d) [All proceeds from sales of hunting licenses under this section shall be used
by the Department to fund conservation law enforcement by the Natural Resources Police
Force.
(e)] The Department may adopt regulations to carry out the provisions of this
section.
10–303.
(a) (1) The Department [annually] may issue ANNUALLY a complimentary
hunting license to the President of the United States, the governor of any state, or [an]
ANY official or [an] enforcement officer of the game and fish management agency of
[another] ANY OTHER state which reciprocally offers complimentary hunting licenses.
(2) (i) Subject to the requirements of § 10–301.1 of this subtitle, the
Department may issue a lifetime complimentary hunting license to a Maryland resident
who certifies that the resident is:
1. A former prisoner of war;
2. An American veteran who the U.S. Department of
Veterans Affairs determines is unemployable; or
3. A 100% service connected disabled American veteran.
(ii) Subject to the requirements of § 10–301.1 of this subtitle, the
Department may issue a lifetime complimentary hunting license to an out–of–state person:
1. Who certifies that the person is:

SENATE BILL 588
A. A former prisoner of war;
B. An American veteran who the U.S. Department of
Veterans Affairs determines is unemployable; or
C. A 100% service connected disabled American veteran; and
2. Whose state of residence extends similar privileges to
former prisoners of war, American veterans who the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs
determines are unemployable, or 100% service connected disabled American veterans of
this State.
(3) A complimentary HUNTING license is not transferable AND SHALL BE
ISSUED WITHOUT A FEE.
(b) For the purposes of this section, “former prisoner of war” means a person who,
while an active service member, was forcibly detained or interned in the line of duty by an
enemy government or its agents, or a hostile force, during a period of armed conflict.
(C) NOT MORE THAN 20 COMPLIMENTARY HUNTING LICENSES ISSUED
UNDER SUBSECTION (A)(1) OF THIS SECTION FOR EACH STATE OTHER THAN
MARYLAND SHALL BE OUTSTANDING AT ANY TIME.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.